District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.53

Certain representations prohibited.

Unless licensed as an asbestos worker under this subchapter, no person shall use the term “asbestos worker” or hold himself or herself out, directly or indirectly, as qualified to abate asbestos or asbestos materials.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.53.